Vermont, session 2025-2026, H51.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 7 V.S.A. § 224 is amended to read:
§ 224. FOURTH-CLASS LICENSES
* * *
(c)(1) At only one fourth-class license location, a licensed manufacturer or
rectifier may sell by the unopened container or distribute by the glass, with or
without charge, alcoholic beverages produced by no not more than five eight
VT LEG #379356 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.51
2025 Page 2 of 3
additional manufacturers or rectifiers, provided these beverages are purchased
on invoice from the manufacturer or rectifier.
(2) A manufacturer or rectifier may sell its product to no not more than
five eight additional manufacturers or rectifiers.
* * *
Sec. 2. 7 V.S.A. § 278 is amended to read:
§ 278. VINOUS BEVERAGE AND MALT BEVERAGE RETAIL
SHIPPING LICENSE
(a) A manufacturer or rectifier of vinous beverages or malt beverages that
is licensed in the State or outside the State and holds valid state and federal
permits and operates a winery or brewery in the United States may apply for a
retail shipping license by filing with the Division of Liquor Control an
application in a form required by the Commissioner accompanied by a copy of
its in-state or out-of-state license and the fee provided in section 204 of this
title.
* * *
(c) A retail shipping license holder, including the holder’s affiliates,
franchises, and subsidiaries, may sell up to 5,000 gallons of vinous beverages
or malt beverages per year directly to first- or second-class licensees and
deliver the beverages by common carrier, the manufacturer’s or rectifier’s own
vehicle, or the vehicle of an employee of a manufacturer or rectifier, provided
VT LEG #379356 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.51
2025 Page 3 of 3
that the beverages are sold on invoice, and no not more than 100 gallons per
month are sold to any single first- or second-class licensee.
* * *
(e) Vinous beverages or malt beverages sold under this section may be
delivered by the vehicle of a second-class license holder if the second-class
licensee cannot obtain the vinous beverages or malt beverages from a
wholesale dealer.
Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #379356 v.1